District of Columbia statutes.
3-605

Jurisdiction.

(a)

The Commission shall have and hereby is vested with the sole direction, management, control, and jurisdiction over all boxing, wrestling, and martial arts contests, matches, exhibitions, and showings, professional as well as amateur, to be conducted, held, given, or shown within the District of Columbia. The Commission is hereby given control, authority, and jurisdiction over all licenses and permits to hold boxing, wrestling, and martial arts contests, matches, and exhibitions for prizes or purses or in which a fee or price in money or value is charged or for which revenue of any type is received, and over all licenses or permits to participants in boxing, wrestling, or martial arts contests, matches or exhibitions; this section shall not be construed, however, to preclude the Commission from differentiating between professional and amateur contests, matches, and exhibitions and charitable and profit-seeking ventures on a reasonable basis. The Commission shall establish the criteria and procedures for the granting of licenses and permits under its jurisdiction and shall promulgate such criteria in accordance with Chapter 5 of Title 2.

(b)

The Commission may exempt schools, colleges, or universities and similar amateur events from any and all of its rules upon proper application by such school, college, or university or by the manager or promoter of such amateur event.

Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-20, § 6, 23 DCR 1809
Feb. 26, 1976, D.C. Law 1-50, § 3, 22 DCR 5127
Sept. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-169, § 2(b), 35 DCR 5749
1981 Ed., § 2-605.
1973 Ed., § 2-1235.